Indiana, session 2026, HB1011.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-29.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29.1. "Attending provider", for
purposes of IC 16-36-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-36-8-1.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-47.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 47.5. "Capable", for purposes of
IC 16-36-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-36-8-2.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-69.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 69.1. "Consulting provider", for
purposes of IC 16-36-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-36-8-3.
SECTION 4. IC 16-18-2-84.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84.5. "Counseling", for purposes
of IC 16-36-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-36-8-4.
SECTION 5. IC 16-18-2-302, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2015,
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 302. (a) "Qualified patient", for purposes of
IC 16-36-4, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-36-4-4.
(b) "Qualified patient", for purposes of IC 16-36-8, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-36-8-5.
(b) (c) "Qualified patient", for purposes of IC 16-42-26, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-42-26-3.
SECTION 6. IC 16-18-2-326.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 326.8. "Self-administer", for
purposes of IC 16-36-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-36-8-6.
SECTION 7. IC 16-18-2-351.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 351.5. "Terminal
illness" means the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 16-25, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-25-1.1-9.
(2) For purposes of IC 16-36-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 16-36-8-7.
SECTION 8. IC 16-36-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Medical Aid in Dying
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "attending provider" means the
provider who has primary responsibility for the care of the patient
and treatment of the patient's terminal illness.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "capable" means that a patient
is, in the opinion of the patient's:
(1) attending provider; or
(2) consulting:
(A) provider;
(B) psychiatrist; or
(C) psychologist;
able to make and communicate health care decisions to health care
providers, including communication through an individual familiar
with the patient's manner of communicating if such an individual
is available.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "consulting provider" means
a provider who is qualified by specialty or experience to make a
professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding the individual's
disease.
(b) The term includes a licensed mental health care provider,
including the following:
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


(1) A consulting psychiatrist licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(2) A consulting psychologist licensed under IC 25-33.
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under
IC 25-23 and who is qualified to practice nursing in a mental
health specialty role.
(4) A behavioral health and human services professional
licensed under IC 25-23.6.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "counseling" means at least one
(1) consultation as necessary with a consulting provider described
in section 3 of this chapter for the purpose of determining whether
the patient is capable and not suffering from a psychiatric
disorder, a psychological disorder, or depression that renders the
patient unable to make and communicate an informed decision.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "qualified patient" means an
individual who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, is an Indiana
resident, and has satisfied the requirements of this chapter in order
to obtain a prescription for medication to bring about a peaceful
death in a humane and dignified manner.
Sec. 6. (a) As used in this chapter, "self-administer" means a
qualified patient performing an affirmative, conscious, voluntary
act to ingest medication prescribed to bring about the qualified
patient's death.
(b) The term does not include administration by parenteral
injection or infusion.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "terminal illness" means an
incurable and irreversible illness that has been confirmed and will,
within reasonable medical judgment, result in death within six (6)
months.
Sec. 8. (a) An individual who:
(1) is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) is an Indiana resident;
(3) is capable;
(4) is diagnosed, by a provider, with a terminal illness that is
confirmed by a consulting provider; and
(5) has voluntarily expressed to the attending provider a wish
to receive medical aid in dying;
may make a written request in accordance with this chapter for
medication for the purpose of bringing about the patient's peaceful
death in a humane and dignified manner. An individual does not
qualify under this chapter solely because of the individual's age or
disability.
(b) In order to receive a prescription for medication to bring
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


about the patient's peaceful death, a qualified patient must have:
(1) made an oral request;
(2) made a written request as described in this chapter; and
(3) either:
(A) reiterated the oral request to the patient's attending
provider not less than fifteen (15) days after making the
initial oral request; or
(B) if the patient's attending provider has medically
confirmed that the patient will, within reasonable medical
judgment, die within fifteen (15) days after making the
initial oral request under this section, reiterated the oral
request for the medication to the attending provider at any
time after making the initial oral request.
(c) At the time the patient makes the second oral request, the
attending provider shall offer the patient an opportunity to rescind
the request.
(d) Evidence of a patient's Indiana residency under subsection
(a) may include the following:
(1) Possession of a valid Indiana driver's license or
identification card issued under IC 9-24.
(2) A valid Indiana voter registration card.
(3) Documentation that the patient currently owns or leases
property in Indiana.
(4) The filing of an Indiana state tax return for the most
recent tax year.
Sec. 9. (a) A patient may rescind a request for medication under
this chapter at any time and in any manner.
(b) No prescription for the medication under this chapter may
be written without the attending provider offering the qualified
patient an opportunity to rescind the request.
Sec. 10. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), at least:
(1) fifteen (15) days must elapse between the patient's initial
oral request for the medication; and
(2) forty-eight (48) hours must elapse between the patient's
written request under this chapter;
before the attending provider may dispense or write a prescription
for the medication under this chapter for the patient.
(b) If the qualified patient's attending provider has medically
confirmed that the qualified patient will, within reasonable medical
judgment, die before the expiration of at least one (1) of the waiting
periods described in subsection (a), the attending provider may
dispense or write a prescription for the medication at any time
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


following the later of the qualified patient's written request or
second oral request under this chapter.
Sec. 11. (a) The written request for medication required by
section 8 of this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) Be on a form issued by the state department, as set forth
in section 12 of this chapter.
(2) Be attested to and signed by the patient.
(3) Be witnessed by at least two (2) individuals who, in the
presence of the patient, attest that, to the best of the
individuals' knowledge and belief, the patient is:
(A) capable;
(B) acting voluntarily; and
(C) not being coerced to sign the request.
(b) At least one (1) of the witnesses described in subsection (a)(3)
may not be any of the following:
(1) A relative of the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption.
(2) An heir to any part of the patient's estate, by will or law,
upon the death of the patient.
(3) An owner, operator, or employee of a health care facility
where the patient is receiving medical treatment or is a
resident.
(4) The patient's attending provider at the time the request is
signed.
Sec. 12. The state department shall prepare and make available
the form described in section 11 of this chapter that states the
following:
"REQUEST FOR MEDICATION TO BRING ABOUT
MY PEACEFUL DEATH
I, _____________________ (insert patient's name), am an
adult of sound mind.
I have been diagnosed with and am suffering from
____________ (insert the name of the terminal illness), which
my attending provider has determined is a terminal illness
and which has been medically confirmed by a consulting
provider.
I have been fully informed of my diagnosis, prognosis, the
nature of medication to be prescribed, and the potential
associated risks, the expected result, and the feasible
alternatives, including comfort care, hospice care, and pain
control.
I request that my attending provider dispense or prescribe
medication to bring about my own peaceful death in a
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


humane and dignified manner.
INITIAL ONE:
___ I have informed my family of my decision and taken their
opinions into consideration.
___ I have decided not to inform my family of my decision.
___ I have no family to inform of my decision.
I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at
any time.
I understand the full import of this request, and I expect to die
when I take the medication to be prescribed. I further
understand that although most deaths occur within three (3)
hours, my death may take longer, and my provider has
counseled me about this possibility.
I make this request voluntarily and without reservation, and
I accept full moral responsibility for my actions.
Signed:_____________
Dated: _____________
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
By initialing and signing below on or after the date the person
named above signs, I declare that the person making and
signing the above request:
is personally known to me or has provided proof of identity;
signed this request in my presence on the date of the person's
signature;
appears to be of sound mind and not under duress or undue
influence; and
is not a patient for whom I am the attending provider.
Witness 1: _____________ _________ _______
Printed Name Signature Date
Witness 2: _____________ __________ ________
Printed Name Signature Date
NOTE: One (1) witness shall not be a relative (by blood, marriage,
or adoption) of the person signing this request, shall not be entitled
to any portion of the person's estate upon death, and shall not own,
operate, or be employed at a health care facility where the person
is a patient or resident. However, if the patient is a resident of a
health facility, one (1) of the witnesses shall be an individual
designated by the health facility.".
Sec. 13. (a) For a patient who has made a request under this
chapter, the attending provider shall do the following:
(1) Make an initial determination of whether the patient:
(A) has a terminal illness;
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


(B) is capable; and
(C) has made the request voluntarily.
(2) Refer the patient to counseling if, after examining the
patient, the attending provider considers counseling
necessary.
(3) Refer the patient to a consulting provider for medical
confirmation:
(A) of the terminal illness diagnosis;
(B) of the patient's capability; and
(C) that the patient is voluntarily making a request under
this chapter.
(4) Request and obtain proof of the patient's Indiana
residency.
(5) Inform the patient of the following to ensure that the
patient is making an informed decision:
(A) The patient's medical diagnosis.
(B) The patient's prognosis.
(C) The potential risks associated with taking the
medication to be prescribed.
(D) The probable result of taking the medication to be
prescribed.
(E) The feasible alternatives to taking the medication,
including:
(i) alternative treatments, and the risks and benefits of
each alternative;
(ii) comfort care;
(iii) hospice care; and
(iv) pain control.
(6) Recommend that the patient notify next of kin.
(7) Counsel the patient:
(A) about the importance of having another individual
present when the patient self-administers the medication
prescribed under this chapter; and
(B) not to self-administer the medication in a public place.
(8) Inform the patient that the patient may rescind the request
for medication at any time and in any manner.
(9) Offer the patient an opportunity to rescind the request at
the end of the fifteen (15) day waiting period under section 9
of this chapter.
(10) Verify immediately before writing the prescription for
the medication under this chapter that the patient is making
an informed decision.
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


(11) Complete the medical record documentation required
under this chapter.
(12) Ensure that the requirements of this chapter have been
met before writing a prescription for medication to enable a
qualified patient to bring about the patient's peaceful death.
(13) Either:
(A) dispense any medication necessary to facilitate the
desired effect and minimize the qualified patient's
discomfort if the attending provider is qualified to dispense
the medication; or
(B) prescribe the medication, and with the qualified
patient's written consent, contact a pharmacist to inform
the pharmacist of the prescription, and transfer the
prescription to the pharmacist for dispensing of the
medication to:
(i) the attending provider;
(ii) the patient; or
(iii) the patient's expressly identified agent.
(b) The attending provider may sign the patient's death
certification.
(c) Not later than thirty (30) days after dispensing or writing a
prescription for medication under this chapter, the attending
provider shall file a copy of the record of the dispensing or
prescription with the state department in a manner and with the
information prescribed by the state department.
(d) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
prescribing the information and manner in which the report
required under subsection (c) must be filed with the state
department.
Sec. 14. Before a patient is qualified and may obtain a
prescription for medication under this chapter, a consulting
provider must do the following:
(1) Examine the patient and the patient's relevant medical
records.
(2) Confirm in writing the attending provider's terminal
illness diagnosis.
(3) Verify that the patient is capable and is making a
voluntary informed decision to request the medication under
this chapter.
Sec. 15. (a) If either the attending provider or the consulting
provider determines that the patient is suffering from any
psychiatric or psychological condition or depression that renders
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


the patient unable to make and communicate an informed decision,
the provider shall refer the patient for counseling.
(b) Medication may not be prescribed under this chapter until
the individual performing the counseling under subsection (a)
determines that the patient is capable and not suffering from a
psychiatric or psychological condition or depression that renders
the patient unable to make and communicate an informed decision.
(c) A patient may not receive a prescription for medication to
end the patient's life unless the patient has made an informed
decision based on an appreciation of the relevant facts and after
being fully informed by the attending provider under section 13 of
this chapter of the following:
(1) The patient's medical diagnosis.
(2) The patient's prognosis.
(3) The potential risks associated with taking the medication
to be prescribed.
(4) The probable result of taking the medication to be
prescribed.
(5) The feasible alternatives to taking the medication,
including:
(A) alternative treatments, and the risks and benefits of
each alternative;
(B) comfort care;
(C) hospice care; and
(D) pain control.
Immediately before writing a prescription for medication under
this chapter, the attending provider shall verify that the patient is
making an informed decision as described in this subsection.
Sec. 16. A request for medication under this chapter may not be
refused because a patient declines, or is unable, to notify the
patient's next of kin as recommended by the attending provider
under section 13(a)(6) of this chapter.
Sec. 17. The attending provider shall maintain or document the
following in the patient's medical record:
(1) All oral requests by a patient for medication to end the
patient's life.
(2) All written requests made by the patient for medication to
end the patient's life.
(3) The attending provider's diagnosis and the patient's
prognosis.
(4) The attending provider's determination that the patient is
capable, is acting voluntarily in making a request for the
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


medication, and is making an informed decision.
(5) The consulting provider's diagnosis and the patient's
prognosis.
(6) The consulting provider's determination that the patient
is capable, is acting voluntarily in making a request for the
medication, and is making an informed decision.
(7) Documentation of any counseling under section 15 of this
chapter and the results of the counseling.
(8) Documentation that the attending provider offered the
patient the opportunity to rescind the written request.
(9) Any medically confirmed certification of the imminence of
the patient's death.
(10) A statement by the attending provider that all of the
requirements under this chapter have been met, including a
notation of the medication prescribed.
Sec. 18. (a) After June 30, 2026, the sale, issuance, or
procurement of a life insurance policy, an accident and sickness
insurance policy, or an annuity may not be conditioned upon or
affected by a person making a request or taking medication under
this chapter if the requirements of this chapter are met.
(b) After June 30, 2026, any provision in a contract, will, or
other agreement that limits a patient's ability to make a request
under this chapter is void.
Sec. 19. (a) Nothing in this chapter authorizes a person,
including the qualified patient, to end a patient's life by lethal
injection, lethal infusion, mercy killing, or active euthanasia.
Actions taken in accordance with this chapter do not, for any
purpose, constitute neglect, suicide, assisted suicide, mercy killing,
or homicide under any law.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to lower a health
care provider's standard of care.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to lower the
requirements of informed health care consent under this article.
Sec. 20. (a) The state department shall review a sample of the
records submitted to the state department by an attending
provider as required by this chapter. The records submitted to the
state department are not public records and may not be inspected
by the public. Only the report described in subsection (c) is a public
record.
(b) The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
concerning the procedure for submitting records to comply with
this chapter.
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


(c) Not later than February 1 of each year, the state department
shall generate and make available to the public an annual
statistical report of the records collected under this section. The
report may not disclose any personally identifiable information of
the providers or the patients whose medical records were
submitted.
Sec. 21. (a) An individual or a health care provider who in good
faith provides medical care in compliance with this chapter,
including:
(1) writing or dispensing a prescription for medication under
this chapter; or
(2) being present when a qualified patient self-administers the
medication under this chapter;
is immune from professional, civil, and criminal liability arising
from the provision of care.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d), a professional
organization or association or a health care provider may not
subject a person to censure, discipline, suspension, loss of license,
loss of privileges, loss of membership, or other penalty for
participating or refusing to participate in good faith compliance
with this chapter.
(c) A health care provider may not be required to participate in
the dispensing or prescribing of medication under this chapter to
a patient who meets the requirements of this chapter. If a health
care provider is unwilling or unable to carry out a patient's request
under this chapter, the health care provider shall transfer, upon
the patient's request, a copy of the patient's relevant medical
records to the subsequent health care provider.
(d) A health care provider may prohibit another health care
provider from participating under this chapter on the prohibiting
health care provider's premises if the prohibiting health care
provider has given notice of the prohibition to health care
providers with privileges to practice on the prohibiting health care
provider's premises. This subsection does not prohibit a health
care provider from providing other health care services to the
patient. The prohibiting health care provider may sanction a health
care provider described in this subsection for participating under
this chapter in violation of the prohibition.
(e) A health care facility may not prohibit a health care provider
from providing services consistent with the applicable standard of
medical care, including:
(1) informing and providing information concerning medical
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


aid in dying;
(2) being present when a qualified patient self-administers the
medication, if requested by the qualified patient or
representative; and
(3) referring the patient to another health care provider.
(f) A request by an individual to provide medication under this
chapter does not solely constitute neglect or elder abuse under any
law and may not be the sole basis for the appointment of a
guardian or conservator of an individual.
(g) This section does not limit civil or criminal liability for
negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.
Sec. 22. (a) A person who, without authorization of the patient,
willfully alters, forges, conceals, or destroys a request for
medication or a rescission of a request for medication under this
chapter with the intent or effect of causing the patient's death
commits a Level 1 felony.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally coerces or exerts
undue influence on a patient to request medication to bring about
the patient's peaceful death or to destroy a rescission of a request
for medication under this chapter commits a Level 1 felony.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally, without
authorization of the patient, alters, forges, conceals, or destroys an
instrument, the reinstatement or revocation of an instrument, or
any other evidence or document reflecting the patient's desires and
interests to obtain medication under this chapter with the intent or
effect of affecting a health care decision commits a Class A
misdemeanor.
Sec. 23. This chapter is severable as provided in IC 1-1-1-8(b).
SECTION 9. IC 27-2-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 30. Nonapplication of Suicide Clause
Sec. 1. For purposes of this chapter, an individual is an "insured
individual" if a life insurance policy provides for the payment of
benefits upon the death of the individual, regardless of whether the
payment of benefits is subject to certain conditions or exclusions.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "life insurance policy" means
any policy of insurance, whether issued on an individual or group
basis, that:
(1) is issued in Indiana or issued for delivery in Indiana; and
(2) provides for the payment of benefits upon the death of the
insured individual.
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104


Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "suicide clause" means a
provision of a life insurance policy under which the payment of
benefits may be denied if the death of the insured individual is the
result of suicide.
Sec. 4. (a) An insurer shall not deny payment of benefits under
a life insurance policy based upon a suicide clause in the life
insurance policy if the death of the insured individual is the result
of medical aid in dying as provided in IC 16-36-8.
(b) Subsection (a) applies regardless of the length of time that
passes between the issuance of the policy and the death of the
insured individual.
SECTION 10. IC 34-30-2.1-229.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 229.2. IC 16-36-8-21 (Concerning
an individual or health care provider providing assistance to a
patient who is terminally ill).
SECTION 11. IC 35-52-16-27.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27.5. IC 16-36-8-22 defines crimes
concerning medical aid in dying.
2026 IN 1011—LS 6005/DI 104